Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.02.050

Election of new officers.

The first election of officers where required for reorganization under a different general plan of government newly adopted in a manner provided in RCW 35A.02.020, 35A.02.030, 35A.06.030, or 35A.06.060, as now or hereafter amended, shall be at the next general municipal election if one is to be held more than ninety days but not more than one hundred and eighty days after certification of a reorganization ordinance or resolution, or otherwise at a special election to be held for that purpose in accordance with RCW 29A.04.330. In the event that the first election of officers is to be held at a general municipal election, such election shall be preceded by a primary election pursuant to RCW 29A.52.210 and 29A.04.311. In the event that the first election of all officers is to be held at a special election rather than at a general election, and notwithstanding any provisions of any other law to the contrary, such special election shall be preceded by a primary election to be held on a date authorized by RCW 29A.04.321, and the persons nominated at that primary election shall be voted upon at the next succeeding special election that is authorized by RCW 29A.04.321: PROVIDED, That in the event the ordinances calling for reclassification or reclassification and reorganization under the provisions of Title 35A RCW have been filed with the secretary of state pursuant to RCW 35A.02.040 in an even-numbered year at least ninety days prior to a state general election then the election of new officers shall be concurrent with the state primary and general election and shall be conducted as set forth in general election law.

Upon reorganization, candidates for all offices shall file or be nominated for and successful candidates shall be elected to specific council positions. The initial terms of office for those elected at a first election of all officers shall be as follows: (1) A simple majority of the persons who are elected as councilmembers receiving the greatest numbers of votes and the mayor in a city with a mayor-council plan of government shall be elected to four-year terms of office, if the election is held in an odd-numbered year, or three-year terms of office, if the election is held in an even-numbered year; and (2) the other persons who are elected as councilmembers shall be elected to two-year terms of office, if the election is held in an odd-numbered year, or one-year terms of office, if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The newly elected officials shall take office immediately when they are elected and qualified, but the length of their terms of office shall be calculated from the first day of January in the year following the election. Thereafter, each person elected as a councilmember or mayor in a city with a mayor-council plan of government shall be elected to a four-year term of office. Each councilmember and mayor in a city with a mayor-council plan of government shall serve until a successor is elected and qualified and assumes office as provided in RCW 29A.60.280.

The former officers shall, upon the election and qualification of new officers, deliver to the proper officers of the reorganized noncharter code city all books of record, documents and papers in their possession belonging to such municipal corporation before the reorganization thereof.

[ 2015 c 53 s 48; 1994 c 223 s 25; 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 7; 1971 ex.s. c 251 s 1; 1970 ex.s. c 52 s 2; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.02.050.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 18: See note following RCW 35A.01.070.